Utah statutes.
31A-19a-304.   Probation.

(1) (a)  In any circumstances that would justify a suspension under Section 31A-19a-303, instead of a suspension, the commissioner may, after a hearing, put the licensee on probation for a specified period not to exceed 12 months from the date of probation.

(b)  The probation order shall state the conditions for retention of the license, which shall be reasonable.

(2)  Violation of the probation constitutes grounds for revocation pursuant to a proceeding authorized under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

